Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1581
Regional housing agency; resolution or ordinance to establish.

Any two or more cities, two or more counties, or any combination of cities and counties may, by resolution or ordinance of their separate governing bodies, establish a regional housing agency by adopting a joint resolution or ordinance declaring that there is a need for a regional housing agency to provide decent, safe, and sanitary housing that is affordable to persons of low and moderate income residing in a multijurisdictional area and that this need would be more efficiently served by the establishment of a regional housing agency.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 10.